Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB854.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 501.080 is amended to read as follows:
Intoxication is a defense to a criminal charge only if the intoxication[such condition]
either:
(1) Negates[Negatives] the existence of an element of the offense; or
(2) Is not voluntarily produced and deprives the defendant of substantial capacity to
either:[ to ]
(a) Appreciate the criminality of his or her conduct; or[ to ]
(b) Conform his or her conduct to the requirements of the law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/3/2026 8:03 AM Jacketed